West Virginia, session 2026, SB346.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 3, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-23-7 of this code, relating to the Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy Technology Board of Examiners (continuing education, 18 CSR 02), is authorized.